cli/samples/todos_spine_requirejs/js/vendor/speak/dictsource/lv_rules
  
//f
        fag)    o               o
       _fant)   o       (mL03_  o:      // fantoms
        fav)    o               o        
        fen)	o	        o
        fj)     o               o
        fil)	o	        o
        fil)	ozo	        ozo:
        fil)	oso	        oso: 
        fl)	o	        o
        flu)	o       (r	o:
       _f)      o       (lijL04_ o:     // folija
        folkl)  o	        o:
        f)	o       (ni	o:
        f)	o       (no	o      
        f)      o       (to	o
        fot)	o	        o:
        fot)	o       (gr	o
        f)	osfo	        osfo:
        fr)	o       (n	o
        furg)	o       (n	o:
  
//g
       _gal)    o       (pL03   o        
        gen)    o               o  
        get)    o               o
        gl)	o       (b	o
        gl)	o       (m      o  
       _gl)     o       (rijL04_ o:     // Glorija
        gl)     o       (ri     o
        gn)	o	        o
        g)      o       (be     o
        g)      o       (g      o:
        g)      o       (ģ      o:
        g)      o       (k      o
        gond)	o       (l	o:  
        g)	o       (n	o
        g) 	o       (nij	o:
       _g)      o       (ra_    uo       // gora
        g)      o       (rij    o:
        g)      o       (ril    o
        g)      o       (ro     uo
       _g)      o       (ros_+  uo
        gon)	o	        o
        g)      o       (tf     o
        g)      o       (tik    o:
        g)      o       (tis    o:
       _gr)     o       (znij   o       // from Russian
        gr)     o       (z+     uo      
        ģe)	o	        o

//h
        ha)	o	        o
        harm)   o       (nē     o
        harm)   o       (nizē   o
        harm)   o       (n      o:
        hed)    o       (n      o:
        herc)   o       (g      o:
        hidr)   o	        o
        hip)    o               o  
        hipn)   o       (zL07_  o:      // ..hipnoze
        hipn)   o               o
        hist)	o	        o
        hl)     o       (ro     o
        hl)	o       (r	o:
        hlor)   o               o
        hol)	o       	o        
        h)	omo             omo
        hrest)  o               o
        hr)	o       (m	o
        hr)     o       (no     o
        hr)	o       (n	o:
        hum)	o	        o
                

//i
        idi)    o               o:
       _ig)	o       (rL03_  o:      // Igors
        il)	o       (g	o:      
        ilg)	o       (nL05_	uo      // Ilgonis   
        im)     o       (n      o 
        impr)   o               o
       _ind)	o	        o
        inkas)  o	        o
        ikr) 	o       (n	o:
        interp) o               o
        intr)	o	        o
        i)	o	        o
        i)      o       (dL07_  o:      // ..iode
        i)      o       (nL07_  o:      // ..ione
        i)	o       (g	o
        is)	o       (n	o
        itr)	o	        o
        itr)	o       (n	o:        
        iv)	o       	o  
        iz)	o       (l	o
       _iz)	o 	        o

//j  
       _j)	o       (_	uo  
        j)	o       (de	o
        j)      odo             odo
        j)      o       (g      o
       _j)      o       (gL03_  o:      // jogs
        j)      o       (nL05_  uo      // jonis
        j)      o       (ni     o
       _j)      o       (tL04_  o       // jota
       _j)      o       (za_    uo      // joza

//k
        kain)   o               o
        kab)    o       (t      o
        kal)    o       (r      o:
        kant)   o               uo
        karb)	o	        o
        kart)	o	        o
       _kart)	o	(nL03_  o:      // kartons
       _kastr)  o       (lL05_  uo      // kastrolis
        kateg)  o       (r      o:
        kin)	o 	        o:
        kinemat)o               o        
       _kl)     on              on
        kl)     o       (zet    o
        k)      ob              ob
        k)      o       (al     o
       _k)      o       (dL07_  uo      // kode
        k)      o       (dē     o       // ..kodē..
        k)      o       (dek    o
        k)      o       (dif    o
       _k)      o       (jL04   o       // koja
        k)      o       (e      o
        k)      odo     (l      uoduo
        k)      o       (dL12_  o:      // ..kods
        k)      o       (gn     o
        k)      okako   (l      okako:
        k)      o       (kog    uo
        k)      o       (ko     o
        kok)    o       (s      o
        k)      o       (ktēl   uo
        k)	o       (ķ	o
        k)      o       (lab    o
        k) 	o       (lā	o
        k) 	o       (le	o
        k) 	o       (lē	o
        k) 	o       (lh	o
        k) 	o       (li	o
        k) 	o       (lī	o
        k) 	o       (lo	o
        kol)	o 	        o
        k) 	o       (lp	o
        k)      o       (mL04_+ o:      // koma
        k)      ompo	        ompo  
        k)      omo             omo
        k)	om      	om
        k)      o       (nL05_  uo
        k)      o       (ņL05_  uo
        k)      ono             ono
        k)	on	        on
       _kont)   o       (s_     uo
        kons)   o 	        o
        kontr)  o	        o:
        konv)   o               o
       _k)      o       (pL04_  uo      // kopa
        k)      o       (pulā   o
        k)      o       (pulē   o
        k)	opo	        uopuo
        k)	o       (pen	o       // Kopenhāgena
        k)      o       (pējL03_  uo    // ..kopējs
        k)      o       (pējL04_  uo    // ..kopēja        
        k)      o       (pj     uo      // ..kopj..      
        k)      o       (pij    o       // ..kopij..
        k)      o       (pē_    o       // ..kopē
        k)      o       (pēC    o       // ..kopēt../..kopēš..
        k)      orpo            orpo
        k)	o       (ra	o
       _k)      o       (rā     o
       _k)      o       (rL07_  uo      // kore
        k)      o       (rL05_+ uo      // ..koris
       _k)      o       (ra_    uo      // kora
       _k)      o       (rdir   uo
        k)      oro             oR2o
        k)      o       (rp     o
       _k)      o       (rdz    uo
        k)      o       (rAf    o
        k)      o       (rej    o
        k)      o       (rek    o
        k)      o       (rel    o
        k)      o       (res    o
        k)      o       (rum    o
        k)      o       (run    o
        k)      o       (rup    o
        k)      o       (rt     o
        kort)   o       (s_     uo        
        k)      o       (rv     o
        k)      o       (sin    o
        k)	o       (sm	o  
        k)      o       (stīm   o
        k)      o       (tan    o 
        k)      o       (te     o       
        k)      o       (tē     o 
        k)	o       (tl	o
        kript)  o               o
        kr)     o       (g      uo
        kr)     okod            okod   
        kr)     o       (ko     uo      // ..kroko..
        kr)     o       (pļo    uo
        kr)     o       (nš     o       
        kr)	o       (s	o
       _kum)    o       (dL07_  uo      // kumode
        kur)    o       (rL07_  o:      // ..kurore
        kūk)    o               uo      // kūko
       _k)	o       (vārnL05_ uo    // kovārnis
        k)	o       (v	o
        kv)     o               o

//l
       _laim)   o       (nL05_  uo      // Laimonis    
        lak)    o       (n      o:   
        leik)   o               o
        lin)    o       (tip    o
        lit)	o	        o
        līg)	o	        uo      // līgo
        lj)	o	        o:
        l)	o       (ģ	o:
        l)      o       (ģiz+   o
        l)      o       (jL06l  o
       _l)      o       (litL04_ o      // Lolita       
        l)	o       (kal	o
        l)      okomo	        okomo
       _l)      olo     (L09    uoluo
        l)      olo     (L10    uoluo   
        l)	omonoso         omon'oso // from Russian
       _l)	o       (n	o
        l)	o       (n	o:
        lab)    o       (ra     o
        l) 	o       (gar	o
       _l)      o       (gL03_  uo       // logs   
        l)	o       (g+	o:
        l)	o       (ģ+	o:      
        l) 	ogo  	        ogo
       _l)      o       (nL07_  uo      // lone
        l)      o       (rn     o
        l)      o       (sj     o   
        l)      o       (tL07_  o       // ..lote
       _l)      o       (tiņL04 o       // lotiņa 
        l)	oto     (_	oto
        l)      o       (zL07_  uo      // ..loze
       _l)      o       (žL04_  o:      // loža
        ļaut)   o               uo     

//m
        maj)    o               o
        mag)	o       (n	uo  
        maig)	o       (n	uo
        makr)	o	        o:
        malk)   o       (L10    uo
        mand)   o       (l      o
        marg)	o       (n	uo
        marat)  o               o:
        mar)    o               o
        maž)    o               o
        mel)    o       (dr     o
        mel)    o       (m      o
        met)	o       (d	o
        metr)	o	        o
        mec)    o               o
        mez)    o               o
        m)	o       (b	o
        m)	o       (car	o:      // Mocarts
        m)      o       (dL04_  o:      // ..moda  
       _m)      o       (dL07_  uo      // mode  
        m)      o       (dal    o
        m)      o       (dāl    o
        m)	o       (de	o
        m)      o       (dif    o
        m)	o       (du	o
        m)	o       (ld	o
        m)	o       (le	o
        m)	o       (li	o
        m)      o       (lu     o
        m)      o       (ment   o
        m)      o       (narh   o
        m)	ongo	        oNgo:
        m)	ongolo	        oNgolo
        m)      o       (nit    o
       _m)      o       (n      o
       _m)      o       (nikL04_ o:     // Monika       
        m)      o       (no 	o
        mon)    o 	        o	
        monot)  o       (n	o:
        m)      o       (nt     o
        m)      o       (nst    o
        m)      o       (p      o
        m)	o       (ra	o
        m)	o       (rā	o
        m)	o       (rf	o
        m)	o       (rs	o
        m)      o       (še     o
        m)	oto	        oto:
        m)	o       (ti	o
        m)	o       (tī	o
        mot)	o       (dro	o
       _m)      o       (zu     o:      // Mozus

//n
        nagl)   o               uo
        nark)	o	        o
        nd)     o       (mL03_  o:
       _nek)    o        (_     uo       
        neir)	o	        o
        nerv)	o	        o
        net)	o	        o
        niek)   o               uo	
        nik)    o               o
       _n)      o       (asL03_ o       // Noass
        n)      o       (dL07_  o:      // ..node
        n)      o       (kL10   o 
        n)      o       (lik    uo
        n)      o       (mL04_  uo      // ..noma
        n)      o       (mL07_  o:      // ..nome
        n)      o       (mijL04_  o:    // ..nomija
        n)	o       (minL06 o
        n)	o       (minL13 o
        n)      o       (men    o
        n)      o       (mL03_  o:      // ..noms
        n)      o       (rb     o
        n)      o       (rd     o
        n)	o       (rm	o
       _n)      o       (vemb   o       // novembris
        n)	ovgorod         ovgorod // from Russian
        n)	o       (vo	o
        n)	o       (vL04_  o       // nova
        n)	o       (vat    o
        n)      o       (vāci   o
        n)	o       (velL07_ o      // novele
        n)	o       (rv	o
        n)      o       (tar    o
        n)      o       (tār    o
       _n)      o       (tL04_  o       // nota
